test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-namdasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюди’, намдӈгухуюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюди’, намдӈгухуюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюна”, намдӈгухуюна”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюда”, намдӈгухуюда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюдо’, намдӈгухуюдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгун, намдӈгун]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгуд, намдӈгуд]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгуда, намдӈгуда]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгуни’, намдӈгуни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгуди’, намдӈгуди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгуди’, намдӈгуди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгуна”, намдӈгуна”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгуда”, намдӈгуда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгудо’, намдӈгудо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: [намдаӈгувась, намдӈгувась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: [намдаӈгурась, намдӈгурась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: [намдаӈгудась, намдӈгудась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: [намдаӈгуминзь, намдӈгуминзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: [намдаӈгуринзь, намдӈгуринзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: [намдаӈгудинзь, намдӈгудинзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: [намдаӈгуваць, намдӈгуваць]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: [намдаӈгураць, намдӈгураць]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: [намдаӈгудонзь, намдӈгудонзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюнась, намдӈгухуюнась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюдась, намдӈгухуюдась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюдась, намдӈгухуюдась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюнинзь, намдӈгухуюнинзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюдинзь, намдӈгухуюдинзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюдинзь, намдӈгухуюдинзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюнаць, намдӈгухуюнаць]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюдаць, намдӈгухуюдаць]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгухуюдонзь, намдӈгухуюдонзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгунась, намдӈгунась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгудась, намдӈгудась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгудась, намдӈгудась]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгунинзь, намдӈгунинзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгудинзь, намдӈгудинзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгудинзь, намдӈгудинзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгунаць, намдӈгунаць]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгудаць, намдӈгудаць]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгудонзь, намдӈгудонзь]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэв, намдӈгодакэв]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэр, намдӈгодакэр]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэда, намдӈгодакэда]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэми’, намдӈгодакэми’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэри’, намдӈгодакэри’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэди’, намдӈгодакэди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэва”, намдӈгодакэва”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэра”, намдӈгодакэра”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: [намдаӈгодакэдо’, намдӈгодакэдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюн, намдӈгодакэхэюн]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюд, намдӈгодакэхэюд]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюда, намдӈгодакэхэюда]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюни’, намдӈгодакэхэюни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюди’, намдӈгодакэхэюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюди’, намдӈгодакэхэюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюна”, намдӈгодакэхэюна”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюда”, намдӈгодакэхэюда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [намдаӈгодакэхэюдо’, намдӈгодакэхэюдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакын, намдӈгодакын]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакыд, намдӈгодакыд]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакыда, намдӈгодакыда]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакыни’, намдӈгодакыни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакыди’, намдӈгодакыди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакыди’, намдӈгодакыди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакына”, намдӈгодакына”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакыда”, намдӈгодакыда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Fut+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [намдаӈгодакыдо’, намдӈгодакыдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcSg3: [намдхарцюв, намдхарцяв]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcSg3: [намдхарцюми’, намдхарцьми’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcSg3: [намдхарцюва”, намдхарцьва”]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcDu3: [намдхарцюхуюн, намдхарцьхаюн]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcDu3: [намдхарцюхуюни’, намдхарцьхаюни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcDu3: [намдхарцюхуюна”, намдхарцьхаюна”]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1+OcPl3: [намдхарцюн, намдхарцян]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1+OcPl3: [намдхарцюни’, намдхарцьни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1+OcPl3: [намдхарцюна”, намдхарцьна”]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: намдхарт
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [намдхар”ӈари’, намдхарӈари’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [намдхар”ӈара”, намдхарӈара”]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [намдхаркаюн”, намдхаркюн”]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [намдхар”ӈахаюди’, намдхарӈахаюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [намдхар”ӈахаюда”, намдхарӈахаюда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: намдхаран”
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: намдхаръяди’
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: намдхаръяда”
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcSg3: [намдхар”ӈамда, намдхарӈамда]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcSg3: [намдхар”ӈамди’, намдхарӈамди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcSg3: [намдхар”ӈамдо’, намдхарӈамдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcDu3: [намдхар”ӈахаюдамда, намдхарӈахаюдамда]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcDu3: [намдхар”ӈахаюдамди’, намдхарӈахаюдамди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcDu3: [намдхар”ӈахаюдамдо’, намдхарӈахаюдамдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3+OcPl3: намдхаръядамда
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3+OcPl3: намдхаръядамди’
     намдась+V+TV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3+OcPl3: намдхаръядамдо’
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: [намдсятыв, намдсетыв]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: [намдсятыр, намдсетыр]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: [намдсятыда, намдсетыда]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: [намдсятыми’, намдсетыми’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: [намдсятыри’, намдсетыри’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: [намдсятыди’, намдсетыди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: [намдсятыва”, намдсетыва”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: [намдсятыра”, намдсетыра”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: [намдсятыдо’, намдсетыдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюн, намдсетыхыюн]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюд, намдсетыхыюд]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюда, намдсетыхыюда]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюни’, намдсетыхыюни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюди’, намдсетыхыюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюди’, намдсетыхыюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюна”, намдсетыхыюна”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюда”, намдсетыхыюда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: [намдсятыхыюдо’, намдсетыхыюдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: [намдсятын, намдсетын]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: [намдсятыд, намдсетыд]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: [намдсятыда, намдсетыда]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: [намдсятыни’, намдсетыни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: [намдсятыди’, намдсетыди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: [намдсятыди’, намдсетыди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: [намдсятына”, намдсетына”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: [намдсятыда”, намдсетыда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: [намдсятыдо’, намдсетыдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcSg3: [намдсятвэв, намдсетвэв]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcSg3: [намдсятвэр, намдсетвэр]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcSg3: [намдсятвэда, намдсетвэда]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcSg3: [намдсятвэми’, намдсетвэми’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcSg3: [намдсятвэри’, намдсетвэри’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcSg3: [намдсятвэди’, намдсетвэди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcSg3: [намдсятвэва”, намдсетвэва”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcSg3: [намдсятвэра”, намдсетвэра”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcSg3: [намдсятвэдо’, намдсетвэдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюн, намдсетвэхэюн]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюд, намдсетвэхэюд]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюда, намдсетвэхэюда]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюни’, намдсетвэхэюни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюди’, намдсетвэхэюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюди’, намдсетвэхэюди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюна”, намдсетвэхэюна”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюда”, намдсетвэхэюда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [намдсятвэхэюдо’, намдсетвэхэюдо’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [намдсятвын, намдсетвын]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [намдсятвыд, намдсетвыд]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [намдсятвыда, намдсетвыда]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [намдсятвыни’, намдсетвыни’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [намдсятвыди’, намдсетвыди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [намдсятвыди’, намдсетвыди’]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [намдсятвына”, намдсетвына”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl2+OcPl3: [намдсятвыда”, намдсетвыда”]
     намдась+V+TV+Hab+Mod/narr+ScPl3+OcPl3: [намдсятвыдо’, намдсетвыдо’]
